Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1809
Application; hearing officer; decision; hearing; procedure; review.

(1) A hearing officer shall consider and rule upon any application made under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act within one hundred eighty days after receipt of all required information related to the crime.

(2) If the hearing officer denies an award of compensation or awards an amount less than or equal to the amount requested by the applicant, the hearing officer shall furnish the applicant with a written statement of the reason for the ruling. The applicant may request a hearing on his or her application within thirty days after receipt of the statement. If the applicant requests a hearing, the hearing officer shall furnish the committee with his or her findings of fact and conclusions of law together with the reasons for the findings and conclusions. The committee shall specify a time and place for a hearing and shall give written notice to the applicant. The hearing shall be held within one hundred twenty days after receipt of the request for a hearing. If no request for a hearing is made within the specified time, the decision of the hearing officer shall be final.

(3) If the hearing officer awards an amount to the applicant greater than the amount requested by the applicant, the hearing officer shall furnish the committee with his or her findings of fact and conclusions of law together with the reasons for granting the applicant more than he or she requested. The committee shall review the decision of the hearing officer taking into consideration the availability of funds appropriated for the purposes of the act and other standards formulated pursuant to section 81-1814. The committee may approve the same amount awarded by the hearing officer, may increase or decrease the amount, or may deny an award of compensation.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 87, § 5.